Nebraska, session 109, LB740.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB740 LB740
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Housing First Supportive Services Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that: (a) Stable housing is a
fundamental determinant of health and a key factor in reducing reliance
on costly emergency, institutional, and correctional systems; (b) many
Nebraskans experiencing homelessness have unmet behavioral health,
substance use, and physical health needs that can be effectively
addressed through integrated supportive housing services; (c) evidence
from other states demonstrates that implementing a Housing First model,
which provides permanent housing without preconditions combined with
voluntary supportive services, reduces chronic homelessness, lowers
medicaid and correctional services expenditures, and improves health
outcomes; (d) the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
permits states to cover housing-related services under a section 1115
demonstration waiver or state plan amendment; and (e) Nebraska can
strengthen its continuum of care and promote fiscal responsibility by
authorizing medicaid reimbursement for supportive housing services.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to: (a) Direct the
department to seek federal approval to cover supportive housing services
under medicaid; (b) expand access to permanent supportive housing
statewide; and (c) leverage state, local, and federal resources to
stabilize individuals and families at risk of homelessness.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Housing First Supportive Services Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) Housing First means an approach to ending homelessness that
prioritizes permanent housing without preconditions including, but not
limited to, sobriety, treatment participation, or criminal justice
compliance, while offering voluntary supportive services to promote
stability and self-sufficiency;
(3) Medicaid means the Medical Assistance Act established under
section 68-901;
-2-

LB740 LB740
2026 2026
(4) Permanent supportive housing means permanent, affordable housing
paired with voluntary, flexible supportive services; and
(5) Supportive housing services means services that assist an
individual in obtaining, maintaining, and retaining housing, including
housing transition, tenancy sustaining, and stabilization services, as
defined by federal guidance.
Sec. 4. (1) The department shall: (a) Seek federal approval through
a section 1115 demonstration waiver, state plan amendment, or other
available federal authority to authorize medicaid reimbursement for
supportive housing services for eligible beneficiaries who are
experiencing, or at risk of, homelessness; and (b) implement the coverage
of such services upon federal approval.
(2) Covered services shall include, but not be limited to: (a)
Housing transition services, including outreach, application assistance,
and landlord engagement; (b) tenancy sustaining services, including case
management, eviction prevention, and links to community resources; (c)
housing navigation and stabilization services; and (d) care coordination
among health care, behavioral health, and substance use treatment
providers.
(3) The department may contract with community-based organizations,
behavioral health regions, local housing authorities, or managed care
entities to deliver supportive housing services.
Sec. 5. (1) The Housing First Supportive Services Fund is created.
The fund shall consist of: (a) Money appropriated by the Legislature; (b)
federal matching funds received from medicaid; and (c) gifts, grants, or
other contributions.
(2) Money in the fund shall be used to: (a) Provide the nonfederal
share of medicaid expenditures authorized under the Housing First
Supportive Services Act; and (b) support housing-related costs that are
not eligible for medicaid reimbursement, including short-term rental
assistance, operating subsidies, and capital investment in supportive
-3-

LB740 LB740
2026 2026
housing.
(3) Money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 6. (1) The department shall coordinate with: (a) The Nebraska
Investment Finance Authority to leverage federal low-income housing tax
credits and other housing resources; (b) the Department of Economic
Development to align community development block grant and federal HOME
Investment Partnerships Program funds; and (c) local continuums of care
and housing authorities to ensure supportive housing units are targeted
to eligible populations.
(2) The department shall jointly develop an annual plan with the
Nebraska Investment Finance Authority that identifies priority
populations, geographic needs, and strategies for integrating housing and
health services.
Sec. 7. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, and each January 1
thereafter, the department shall submit an electronic report to the
Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature and the
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature that includes (a) the number
of individuals receiving supportive housing services, (b) the number of
individuals transitioned into, and retained in, permanent supportive
housing, (c) health care and behavioral health outcomes, and (d)
estimated cost offsets to medicaid, correctional services, and other
state programs.
(2) The department shall contract with an independent entity to
evaluate the program's effectiveness within five years after the date of
implementation and report its findings to the Legislature.
Sec. 8. The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Housing First Supportive Services Act,
including, but not limited to, establishing (1) eligibility criteria, (2)
provider qualifications, (3) reimbursement methodologies, and (4) service
-4-

LB740 LB740
2026 2026
delivery standards consistent with federal requirements.
-5-